src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION
@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Pron:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>се _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;


!LEXICON _LAK-PersPronGen_CX
!@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ _LAK-Tenses1 ;
!+Der+Der/MWN+N:  _LAK-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Der+Der/MWN+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ьсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Pron:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>се _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}нсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}ньсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

!LEXICON _KIT-PersPronGen_CX
!@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ _KIT-Tenses1 ;
!+Der+Der/MWN+N:  _KIT-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Der+Der/MWN+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ьсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Pron:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>се _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}нсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}ньсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

!LEXICON _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX
!@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
!+Der+Der/MWN+N: _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Der+Der/MWN+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@ьсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/sje+Pron:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>се _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}нсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
!@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@+Der+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Indef+Der+Der/sje+Pron+Dem:@C.DNUM@@C.TPERS@@C.TNUM@%>%{оеэØ%}ньсе _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;



!LEXICON _KAL-PersPronGen_CX-1A
!          _KAL-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

!LEXICON CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-1A
!@P.TNUM.SG@@C.TPERS@+Sg+Nom+Def:@P.TNUM.SG@@C.TPERS@%>%{оеэØ%}сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
!@P.TNUM.PL@@C.TPERS@+Pl+Nom+Def:@P.TNUM.PL@@C.TPERS@%>тне _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
!@P.DNUM.PL@+Pl+Nom+Def:@P.DNUM.PL@%>тне _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;

!LEXICON _LAK-PersPronGen_CX-1A
!          _LAK-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

!LEXICON _KIT-PersPronGen_CX-1A
!          _KIT-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-1A
@P.TNUM.SG@@C.TPERS@+Sg+Nom+Def:@P.TNUM.SG@@C.TPERS@%>сь _OSH-Tenses1 ;
@P.TNUM.PL@@C.TPERS@+Pl+Nom+Def:@P.TNUM.PL@@C.TPERS@%>тне _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
@P.DNUM.PL@+Pl+Nom+Def:@P.DNUM.PL@%>тне _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
          _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

!LEXICON _KAL-PersPronGen_CX-2
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

!LEXICON CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-2
!+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1  _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
!@U.DNUM.SG@+Sg+Dat+Def:@U.DNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нтень K ; 
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Gen:%>%{оеэØ%}нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
!+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Lat:%>%{оеэØ%}в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
!+Prl:Г2а _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
!+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

!LEXICON _LAK-PersPronGen_CX-2
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

!LEXICON _KIT-PersPronGen_CX-2
! CONSONANT-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1  _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
@U.DNUM.SG@+Sg+Dat+Def:@U.DNUM.SG@%>тнень K ; 
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Tra:%>кс _OSH-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

!LEXICON _KAL-PersPronGenCX_DX
!@U.DNUM.SG@!+Sg+Gen+Def:@U.DNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;
!     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON _OSH-PersPronGenCX_DX
@U.DNUM.SG@+Sg+Gen+Def:@U.DNUM.SG@%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON _KUDO-PersPronGenCX_DX
@U.DNUM.SG@+Sg+Gen+Def:@U.DNUM.SG@%>нть K ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;


LEXICON PersPronGenCX_DX-1
 K; 

LEXICON PossPX1-NomSg
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>м K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>т%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>з%{оэØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>н{оеэ%}к K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>м%{ое%}к K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>нк K ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>ст K ;


! This should be checked. Where does it come from?
! 

LEXICON PRON_
: K ;

!! Demonstrative

LEXICON PRON-DEM
не+Det+Dem+Pl:не K ;
неке+Det+Dem+Pl:неке K ;
нона+Det+Dem+Pl:нона K ;
не+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen:нень K ;
не+Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:ненень K ;
неть+Pron+Dem:не PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
некеть+Pron+Dem:неке PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
нонат+Pron+Dem+Pl:нона PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
се+Pron+Dem:се PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
теке+Pron+Dem:теке NB-CX-ZERODECLENSIONTYPE-NOCLT ;
теке+Pron+Dem+SP+Abl+Indef:текенде K ;
теке+Pron+Dem+SP+Ela+Indef:текеньстэ K ;
теке+Pron+Dem+SP+Ine+Indef:текеньсэ K ;

тона+Pron+Dem:тона PRON-DEM_TONA ;
се+Pron+Dem:се PRON-DEM_TE ;
те+Pron+Dem:те PRON-DEM_TE ;

мезе-мезе+Pron+Distr+Sg+Nom+Indef:мӒ4зе-мӒ4зе # ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>де K ; 
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>денть K ; 
+SP+Abl+Indef+Use/NG:%>нде K ; 
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ; 
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ; 
+SP+Ela+Indef:%>ньстэ K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>нестэ K ; 
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ; 
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ; 
+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>ньс K ; 
+Sg+Ill+Indef+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>нес K ; 
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>сэнть K ; 
+SP+Ine+Indef:%>ньсэ K ; 
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>ньсэнть K ; 
+SP+Ine+Indef+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>несэ K ; 
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>кс K ; 
 PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE-PL
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тневтеме K ; 
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнеде K ; 
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тненень K ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнестэ K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнес K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнесэ K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне K ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнева K ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} K ; 

!LEXICON A-IS-DEM_ISTJAMO !2022-10-17
!DET-IS-DEM_ISTJAMO ;
LEXICON DET-IS-DEM_ISTJAMO !! истямо:истя
!+Dem+Dep:мо # ;
!+Dem+Der+Der/MWN:м N_PANGO-Def-Declension ;
!+Dem+Der+Der/MWN:м _PANGO-Indef-Declension ;
!+Dem+Der+Der/MWN:мо N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
!+Dem+Der+Der/MWN: NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION-TNE2 ;
:м N_PANGO-Def-Declension ;
:м _PANGO-Indef-Declension ;
:мо N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
: NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION-TNE2 ;

!! Interrogative
!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-MANNER !! 
!+Indef+Manner: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-PERS-SG-NOM
!+Indef+Sg+Nom: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-PERS-ABL
!+Indef+SP+Abl: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-ELA !! What should be done 
!+Indef+Ela: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-INE !! What should be done 
+Indef+Ine: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-LAT !! What should be done 
!+Indef+Lat: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-PRL !! What should be done 
!+Indef+Prl: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-MANNER !! кода:кода
!+Manner: #  ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-PERS !! ки:ки
!+Pers+Sg+Nom:е #  ;
!+Pers: NB-CX-ZERODECLENSIONTYPE-NOCLT  ;

LEXICON DET-INTERR !! кона:кона
!! This is not the same as indefinite
!! PronRel-kona
: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-ELA !! What should be done 
+Ela: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-INE !!= @CODE@ косо 
+Ine: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-LAT !! What should be done 
!+Lat: # ;

LEXICON PERS
тонсь+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Short+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Pl:Ӓ3сетне _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
тонсь+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Short+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl:Ӓ3сеттне _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
сонсь+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Short+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl:Ӓ3сестнэ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
сонсь+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Short+Der+Der/MWN+N+Pl:Ӓ3сесттнэ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
